Nevada, session 83, AB592.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. The following state officers, employees and
medical and related positions are entitled to receive approximate
annual salaries of not more than the maximum amounts set forth
following their specified titles or positions:
Annual
Title or Position Salary
1. Office of the Attorney General:
Administrative Services Officer ................................ $104,729
Assistant Attorney General (each) ............................... 198,825
Attorney General Counsel for
Prosecuting Attorneys ............................................ 151,902
Bureau Chief (each) ..................................................... 180,534
Chief Deputy Attorney General (each) ........................ 167,014
Chief Financial Officer ................................................ 144,519
Chief Investigator ........................................................ 151,068
Chief Personnel Manager ............................................ 124,068
Chief of Staff ............................................................... 198,825
Construction Law Counsel .......................................... 187,431
Deputy Attorney General (each) ................................. 135,201
Engineer....................................................................... 116,386
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Financial Analyst (each) .............................................. 115,318
General Counsel .......................................................... 187,431
Information Technology Chief .................................... 141,633
Investigator (each) ......................................................... 93,220
Legal Researcher (each) ................................................ 79,532
Ombudsman for Victims of Domestic
Violence, Sexual Assault and Human
Trafficking .............................................................. 110,353
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Program Specialist, Technological
Crimes .................................................................... $79,532
Public Information Officer .......................................... 100,209
Regulatory Manager (each) ......................................... 129,193
Senior Deputy Attorney General (each) ...................... 151,108
Senior Economist ........................................................ 144,544
Senior Engineer ........................................................... 129,080
Senior Regulatory Analyst .......................................... 120,624
Solicitor General .......................................................... 187,431
Special Assistant Attorney General,
Military ................................................................... 151,902
Special Assistant Attorney General,
Neighborhood ......................................................... 151,902
Special Counsel (each) ................................................ 187,431
Supervising Legal Researcher (each) ............................ 83,508
Technical Staff Manager ............................................. 129,193
Victim’s Advocate (each) .............................................. 91,502
2. Office of the Controller:
Chief Deputy Controller ............................................ $151,902
Deputy Controller for Financial
Reporting ................................................................ 151,902
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
3. Office of the Governor, Agency for Nuclear Projects:
Executive Assistant ..................................................... $79,532
Executive Director ....................................................... 162,956
Planner/Researcher ...................................................... 117,599
Planning Division Administrator ................................. 148,340
Technical Programs Division
Administrator ......................................................... 148,340
4. Office of the Governor, Governor’s Technology Office:
Executive Assistant ..................................................... $79,532
Chief Communications & Policy Officer .................... 125,735
Chief Data Officer ....................................................... 138,385
Deputy Chief Information Officer, Chief
Technology Officer ................................................ 151,902
Deputy Director, Deputy Chief
Information Officer ................................................ 165,420
Deputy Director, Office of Information
Security and Cyber Defense ................................... 147,448
Director, State Chief Information
Officer .................................................................... 165,420
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
5. Office of the Governor, Nevada Athletic Commission:
Chief Assistant ............................................................ $95,437
Executive Director ....................................................... 138,385
6. Office of the Governor, Office for New Americans:
Director ...................................................................... $100,209
7. Office of the Governor, Office of Emergency Management:
Administrator, Emergency
Management/Homeland Security ......................... $165,420
Deputy Administrator, Emergency
Management/Homeland Security ........................... 132,294
8. Office of the Governor, Office of Energy:
Deputy Director ......................................................... $132,294
Director ........................................................................ 151,108
9. Office of the Governor, Office of Federal Assistance:
Director ...................................................................... $114,689
Executive Grants Analyst (each) ................................... 87,567
Senior Executive Grants Analyst ................................. 104,715
10. Office of the Governor, Office of Finance:
Administrator, Office of Project
Management, CORE.NV...................................... $158,857
Chief Assistant Budget Administrator ......................... 125,735
Deputy Director (each) ................................................ 165,420
Director, Office of Finance.......................................... 180,534
Director, Office of Project Management,
CORE.NV .............................................................. 174,967
Division Administrator, Internal Audits ...................... 151,902
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Organizational Change Manager, Office
of Project Management, CORE.NV ....................... 145,053
11. Office of the Governor, Office of Science, Innovation and
Technology:
Director ...................................................................... $125,766
12. Office of the Lieutenant Governor:
Administrative Secretary ............................................. $67,577
Assistant to the Lieutenant Governor
(each) ...................................................................... 100,112
Chief of Staff ............................................................... 105,116
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
13. Office of the Secretary of State:
Business Portal Administrator ................................... $144,966
Chief Deputy ............................................................... 165,420
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Chief, Enforcement ................................................... $137,944
Deputy Secretary of State, Commercial
Recordings.............................................................. 138,385
Deputy Secretary of State, Elections ........................... 151,902
Deputy Secretary of State, Operations ........................ 138,385
Deputy Secretary of State, Southern
Nevada.................................................................... 138,385
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Public Information Officer .......................................... 100,209
Securities Administrator .............................................. 144,519
14. Office of the State Treasurer:
Chief Deputy State Treasurer .................................... $165,420
Chief of Staff ............................................................... 165,420
Deputy State Treasurer, Cash
Management ........................................................... 138,385
Deputy State Treasurer, Debt
Management ........................................................... 138,385
Deputy State Treasurer, Financial
Literacy and Security ............................................. 138,385
Deputy State Treasurer, Investments ........................... 165,420
Deputy State Treasurer, Unclaimed
Property .................................................................. 138,385
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Executive Director, Millennium
Scholarship ............................................................. 138,385
Executive Director, Nevada State
Infrastructure Bank ................................................. 165,420
Senior Deputy State Treasurer (each) .......................... 151,902
15. Department of Administration:
Deputy Director ......................................................... $165,420
Director ........................................................................ 180,534
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
(a) Administrative Services Division
Division Administrator .............................................. $151,902
(b) Division of Human Resource Management
Administrator, Equal Employment
Opportunity .......................................................... $115,319
Division Administrator ................................................ 151,902
Division Deputy Administrator (each) ........................ 124,068
(c) Division of State Library, Archives and Public Records
Division Administrator .............................................. $138,385
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
(d) Fleet Services Division
Division Administrator .............................................. $115,319
(e) Hearings Division
Appeals Officer (each) .............................................. $151,108
Hearing Officer (each) ................................................. 100,209
Information Systems Specialist ..................................... 87,636
Senior Appeals Officer ................................................ 167,014
(f) Mail Services Division
Division Administrator .............................................. $115,319
(g) Public Employees’ Deferred Compensation Program
Deferred Compensation Executive
Officer .................................................................. $138,385
(h) Purchasing Division
Attorney ..................................................................... $135,201
Division Administrator ................................................ 138,385
(i) Risk Management Division
Division Administrator .............................................. $124,068
(j) State Public Works Division
Administrator ............................................................. $174,967
Deputy Administrator, Buildings and
Grounds .................................................................. 151,902
Deputy Administrator, Code
Compliance and Enforcement ................................ 165,420
Deputy Administrator, Professional
Services .................................................................. 165,420
Project Manager II (each) ............................................ 138,385
Project Manager III (each)........................................... 151,108
16. State Department of Agriculture:
Deputy Director ......................................................... $151,902
Director ........................................................................ 165,420
(a) Division of Administrative Services
Division Administrator .............................................. $138,385
(b) Division of Animal Industry
Deputy Administrator ................................................ $124,068
Division Administrator ................................................ 138,385
(c) Division of Food and Nutrition
Deputy Administrator ................................................ $124,068
Division Administrator ................................................ 138,385
(d) Division of Measurement Standards
Division Administrator .............................................. $138,385
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
(e) Division of Plant Health and Compliance
Deputy Administrator ................................................ $124,068
Division Administrator ................................................ 138,385
(f) Miscellaneous
Executive Assistant ..................................................... $79,532
Industry and Global Trade Coordinator ...................... 109,688
State Veterinarian ........................................................ 155,034
Supervisor, Animal Disease Laboratory ...................... 137,127
Veterinary Diagnostician ............................................. 127,052
17. Department of Business and Industry:
Deputy Director, Administration ............................... $138,385
Deputy Director, Programs .......................................... 151,902
Director ........................................................................ 180,534
(a) Office of the Nevada Attorney for Injured Workers
Deputy Attorney (each) ............................................. $135,201
Division Administrator ................................................ 167,014
Senior Attorney (each) ................................................ 151,108
(b) Division of Financial Institutions
Certified Public Accountant ........................................ $95,699
Deputy Division Administrator (each) ........................ 115,318
Division Administrator ................................................ 138,385
(c) Division of Industrial Relations
Attorney (each) .......................................................... $135,201
Chief Investigator ........................................................ 115,318
Deputy Division Administrator (each) ........................ 124,068
Deputy Division Administrator,
Mechanical Unit ..................................................... 115,318
Deputy Division Administrator, Mine
Safety...................................................................... 115,318
Deputy Division Administrator, Safety
Consultation ........................................................... 115,318
Division Administrator ................................................ 151,902
Senior Attorney ........................................................... 151,108
(d) Division of Insurance
Deputy Division Administrator (each) ...................... $138,385
Deputy Division Administrator, Captive
Insurers ................................................................... 135,201
Division Administrator ................................................ 165,420
Insurance Counsel/Hearing Officer
(each) ...................................................................... 138,385
Lead Actuary (each) .................................................... 178,216
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Lead Insurance Counsel/Hearing Officer .................. $151,108
Legal Researcher ........................................................... 79,532
(e) Division of Mortgage Lending
Certified Public Accountant ........................................ $95,699
Deputy Division Administrator ................................... 115,318
Division Administrator ................................................ 138,385
(f) Government Employee-Management Relations Board
Division Administrator .............................................. $124,068
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
(g) Housing Division
Chief Assistant ............................................................ $95,437
Chief Financial Officer ................................................ 135,201
Deputy Administrator .................................................. 115,318
Deputy Division Administrator ................................... 115,318
Division Administrator ................................................ 138,385
Housing Advocate ....................................................... 100,209
(h) Nevada Transportation Authority
Attorney ..................................................................... $135,201
Chief Transportation Inspector .................................... 131,718
Commissioner (each) ................................................... 151,423
Deputy Division Administrator ................................... 135,201
Division Administrator ................................................ 161,491
Financial Analyst (each) .............................................. 115,453
Manager ....................................................................... 125,093
(i) Office of Labor Commissioner
Chief Assistant ............................................................ $74,216
Deputy Division Administrator ................................... 115,318
Division Administrator ................................................ 138,385
State Apprenticeship Director ..................................... 103,920
(j) Office of Nevada Boards, Commissions and Councils
Standards
Deputy Director ......................................................... $151,902
Senior Attorney ........................................................... 151,108
(k) Real Estate Division
Deputy Division Administrator ................................. $115,318
Division Administrator ................................................ 138,385
Ombudsman for Owners in Common-
Interest Communities and
Condominium Hotels ............................................. 105,117
Senior Attorney ........................................................... 151,108
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
(l) Taxicab Authority
Attorney ..................................................................... $135,201
Deputy Division Administrator ................................... 124,068
Division Administrator ................................................ 161,491
(m) Miscellaneous
Administrative Law Judge ......................................... $151,108
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Ombudsman of Consumer Affairs for
Minorities ............................................................... 105,117
18. State Department of Conservation and Natural Resources:
Deputy Director (each) .............................................. $151,902
Director ........................................................................ 180,534
(a) Division of Environmental Protection
Division Administrator .............................................. $174,967
(b) Division of Forestry
Division Administrator .............................................. $151,902
(c) Division of Natural Heritage
Administrator ............................................................. $138,385
(d) Division of Outdoor Recreation
Deputy Division Administrator ................................. $115,318
Division Administrator ................................................ 124,068
(e) Division of State Lands
Division Administrator .............................................. $138,385
(f) Division of State Parks
Division Administrator .............................................. $151,902
(g) Division of Water Resources
Administrative Law Judge (licensed
attorney) ............................................................... $151,108
Chief Administrative Law Judge
(licensed attorney) .................................................. 167,014
Chief, Southern Nevada Branch .................................. 146,798
District Supervisor, Water
Commissioner ........................................................ 100,209
Division Administrator ................................................ 174,967
(h) Office of Historic Preservation
Administrator ............................................................. $138,385
(i) Miscellaneous
Executive Assistant ..................................................... $79,532
19. Department of Corrections:
Assistant to the Director ............................................ $125,729
Deputy Director, Industrial Programs ......................... 165,420
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Deputy Director, Operations, Northern
Region .................................................................. $165,420
Deputy Director, Operations, Southern
Region .................................................................... 165,420
Deputy Director, Support Services .............................. 165,420
Director ........................................................................ 180,534
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Medical Director .......................................................... 270,514
Mental Health Director ................................................ 151,902
20. Department of Education:
Chief Strategy Officer ............................................... $131,718
Deputy Superintendent of the Division
of Educator Effectiveness & Family
Engagement ............................................................ 151,902
Deputy Superintendent of the Student
Achievement Division ............................................ 151,902
Deputy Superintendent of the Student
Investment Division ............................................... 151,902
Director, Office for a Safe and
Respectful Learning Environment ......................... 124,068
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Superintendent of Public Instruction ........................... 180,534
21. Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation:
Deputy Director (each) .............................................. $165,420
Director ........................................................................ 180,534
(a) Employment Security Division
Deputy Staff Attorney ............................................... $135,201
Division Administrator ................................................ 165,420
Senior Attorney ........................................................... 151,108
(b) Governor’s Office of Workforce Innovation
Executive Director ..................................................... $137,932
(c) Information Technology Division
Division Administrator .............................................. $151,902
(d) Nevada Equal Rights Commission
Division Administrator .............................................. $124,068
(e) Rehabilitation Division
Chief, Disability Employment Policy ........................ $115,319
Division Administrator ................................................ 151,902
(f) Miscellaneous
Chief Auditor ............................................................. $127,246
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Executive Assistant ..................................................... $79,532
Hearing Officer (each) ................................................. 100,209
22. Department of Human Services:
(a) Aging and Disability Services Division
Chief, Elder Rights (licensed attorney) ..................... $135,201
Deputy Division Administrator (each) ........................ 151,902
Division Administrator ................................................ 165,420
Executive Director, Nevada
Commission for Persons Who are
Deaf and Hard of Hearing ........................................ 92,803
Regional Coordinator (each) ....................................... 110,353
Sign Language Interpreter (each) ................................ 105,219
(b) Director’s Office
Deputy Director, Administrative
Services ................................................................ $151,902
Deputy Director, Fiscal Services ................................. 151,902
Deputy Director, Programs .......................................... 151,902
Director ........................................................................ 180,534
(c) Division of Child and Family Services
Bureau Chief, Youth Parole ...................................... $138,385
Deputy Division Administrator (each) ........................ 151,902
Division Administrator ................................................ 165,420
Medical Epidemiologist............................................... 219,975
Superintendent, Caliente Youth Center ....................... 138,385
Superintendent, Nevada Youth Training
Center ..................................................................... 138,385
Superintendent, Summit View Youth
Center ..................................................................... 145,300
(d) Division of Public and Behavioral Health
Chief Medical Officer ............................................... $305,046
Deputy Division Administrator (each) ........................ 151,902
Division Administrator ................................................ 174,967
Hospital Administrator ................................................ 151,108
Medical Epidemiologist............................................... 219,975
Medical Program Coordinator, Mental
Health Program ...................................................... 268,002
State Epidemiologist .................................................... 138,385
Statewide Psychiatric Medical Director ...................... 292,594
Statewide Suicide Prevention
Coordinator ............................................................ 100,209
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Statewide Suicide Prevention
Trainer/Networking Facilitator
(each) ...................................................................... $95,437
(e) Division of Social Services
Deputy Division Administrator (each) ...................... $151,902
Division Administrator ................................................ 165,420
(f) Office for Consumer Health Assistance
Chief, Elder Rights .................................................... $124,068
Governor’s Consumer Health Advocate...................... 138,385
Ombudsman for Consumer Health
Assistance (each) .................................................... 110,353
(g) Office of Minority Health and Equity
Manager ..................................................................... $100,209
(h) Miscellaneous
Agency Manager (each) ............................................ $151,108
Executive Assistant (each) ............................................ 79,532
23. Department of Indigent Defense Services:
Deputy Director (each) .............................................. $174,967
Deputy Public Defender (each) ................................... 135,201
Deputy Public Defender, Appellate
(each) ...................................................................... 135,201
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Executive Director ....................................................... 176,555
Investigator (each) ......................................................... 93,220
State Public Defender .................................................. 167,014
Supervising Public Defender (appeals) ....................... 151,108
Supervising Public Defender (office)
(each) ...................................................................... 151,108
Supervising Public Defender (trial) ............................. 151,108
24. Department of Motor Vehicles:
(a) Division of Compliance Enforcement
Deputy Administrator ................................................ $138,385
Division Administrator ................................................ 151,902
(b) Division of Customer Services
Deputy Administrator (each) ..................................... $138,385
Division Administrator ................................................ 151,902
(c) Division of Information Technology
Division Administrator .............................................. $151,902
(d) Division of the Office of the Director
Deputy Director ......................................................... $174,967
Director ........................................................................ 180,534
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Executive Assistant ..................................................... $79,532
(e) Division of Research and Project Management
Deputy Administrator ................................................ $138,385
Division Administrator ................................................ 158,857
Organizational Change Manager ................................. 145,053
(f) Fiscal Operations Division
Division Administrator .............................................. $138,385
(g) Motor Carrier Division
Division Administrator .............................................. $138,385
(h) Office of Administrative Hearings
Administrative Law Judge (licensed
attorney) (each) .................................................... $151,108
Administrative Law Judge (other than
licensed attorney) (each) ........................................ 135,201
Chief Administrative Law Judge
(licensed attorney) .................................................. 167,014
Chief Administrative Law Judge (other
than licensed attorney) ........................................... 151,108
25. Department of Native American Affairs:
Executive Director ..................................................... $138,385
26. Department of Public Safety:
Deputy Director ......................................................... $174,967
Director ........................................................................ 180,534
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
(a) Capitol Police Division
Division Administrator .............................................. $165,420
(b) Division of Parole and Probation
Chair, State Board of Parole
Commissioners ..................................................... $151,902
Division Administrator ................................................ 174,967
Executive Director, State Board of
Parole Commissioners ............................................ 124,068
Executive Secretary, State Board of
Parole Commissioners .............................................. 79,532
Member, State Board of Parole
Commissioners (each) ............................................ 124,068
(c) Investigation Division
Analyst Supervisor/Nevada Analytical
Information Center Manager ................................ $104,731
Division Administrator ................................................ 174,967
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
(d) Nevada Highway Patrol Division
Chief .......................................................................... $174,967
Lieutenant Colonel ...................................................... 174,967
(e) Office of Traffic Safety
Division Administrator, Highway Safety
Planning and Administration ................................ $135,201
(f) Records, Communications and Compliance Division
Deputy Administrator ................................................ $135,201
Division Administrator ................................................ 158,702
(g) State Fire Marshal Division
Division Administrator .............................................. $151,902
27. Department of Sentencing Policy:
Deputy Director ......................................................... $135,201
Executive Director ....................................................... 176,555
28. Department of Taxation:
Administrative Law Judge (licensed
attorney) ............................................................... $151,108
Chief Administrative Law Judge
(licensed attorney) .................................................. 167,014
Chief Deputy Director ................................................. 165,420
Deputy Director (each) ................................................ 151,902
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Executive Director ....................................................... 180,534
State Demographer ...................................................... 135,201
29. Department of Tourism and Cultural Affairs:
Administrator, Nevada Arts Council ......................... $138,385
Advertising Sales Representative .................................. 83,696
Art Director (each) ........................................................ 81,592
Chief Deputy, Administration ..................................... 138,385
Deputy Director, Division of Tourism ........................ 138,385
Deputy Director, Marketing and
Advertising ............................................................. 109,689
Deputy Director, Sales and Industry
Partners ................................................................... 109,689
Development Specialist, Nevada
Magazine (each) ....................................................... 91,232
Development Specialist, Tourism (each) .................... 102,988
Development Specialist II, Tourism ............................ 109,689
Director ........................................................................ 165,420
Division Administrator, Museums and
History .................................................................... 138,385
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Editor Publisher, Nevada Magazine .......................... $124,622
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Managing Editor, Publications ...................................... 95,796
Production Manager ...................................................... 77,219
Project Analyst .............................................................. 79,006
Project Analyst II (each) ................................................ 92,121
Public Information Officer .......................................... 113,046
Public Relations Specialist .......................................... 102,989
30. Department of Transportation:
Administrator of External Civil Rights ..................... $138,385
Assistant Director, Administrative
Services .................................................................. 151,902
Assistant Director, Engineering................................... 174,967
Assistant Director, Operations ..................................... 174,967
Assistant Director, Planning and
Program Development............................................ 151,902
Chief Pilot.................................................................... 151,108
Communications Director ........................................... 124,068
Deputy Director (each) ................................................ 176,555
Director ........................................................................ 180,534
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Hearings Officer .......................................................... 100,209
Pilot II .......................................................................... 124,068
Pilot III (each) ............................................................. 135,201
Rural Communities Specialist ..................................... 100,209
31. Department of Veterans Services:
Administrator, Veterans Home .................................. $151,902
Deputy Director, Benefits ............................................ 115,319
Deputy Director, Healthcare Services ......................... 115,319
Director ........................................................................ 135,201
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
32. Department of Wildlife:
Chief Game Warden .................................................. $138,385
Deputy Director (each) ................................................ 151,902
Director ........................................................................ 165,420
Division Administrator, Conservation
Education................................................................ 124,068
Division Administrator, Data and
Technology Services .............................................. 124,068
Division Administrator, Fisheries
Management ........................................................... 124,068
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Division Administrator, Game
Management ......................................................... $124,068
Division Administrator, Habitat .................................. 124,068
Division Administrator, Wildlife
Diversity ................................................................. 124,068
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
33. Colorado River Commission of Nevada:
Administrative Services Officer ................................ $168,835
Assistant Director, Energy Information
Systems .................................................................. 151,857
Assistant Director, Engineering and
Operations .............................................................. 168,732
Assistant Hydropower Program
Manager.................................................................. 143,423
Assistant Power Supply Planner .................................. 131,717
Deputy Director ........................................................... 177,168
Director ........................................................................ 186,335
Division Head, Water .................................................. 168,835
Energy Accountant ...................................................... 111,345
Energy Services Manager ............................................ 177,168
Environmental Program Manager ............................... 151,857
Hydropower Program Manager ................................... 160,297
Manager, Power Accounting ....................................... 151,108
Manager, Power Planner ............................................. 151,108
Natural Resource Specialist (each) .............................. 146,798
Network Administrator ................................................ 109,674
Office Manager .............................................................. 92,803
Power Facilities Communication
Technician (each) ................................................... 118,114
Power Facilities Electrician (each) .............................. 109,674
Power Facilities Manager (each) ................................. 151,857
Power Supply Manager ............................................... 168,835
Power Supply Planner ................................................. 151,902
Senior Energy Accountant (each) ................................ 126,547
Senior Power Facilities Electrician
(each) ...................................................................... 118,114
Senior Power Facilities Engineer ................................ 146,017
34. Commission on Ethics:
Associate Counsel ..................................................... $135,201
Commission Counsel ................................................... 151,108
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Executive Director ..................................................... $151,108
Investigator .................................................................... 93,220
Senior Legal Researcher ................................................ 79,532
35. Commission on Judicial Discipline:
General Counsel ........................................................ $198,825
36. Commission on Mineral Resources:
Administrator, Division of Minerals ......................... $148,357
Chief for Dangerous Mines ......................................... 106,743
Chief for Mine Regulation........................................... 106,743
Deputy Administrator, Division of
Minerals.................................................................. 118,683
Field Specialist, Minerals (each) ................................... 90,368
Program Manager, Oil, Gas and
Geothermal ............................................................. 136,603
37. Nevada Gaming Control Board:
(a) Administration Division
Chief .......................................................................... $151,068
Chief Deputy ............................................................... 137,336
(b) Audit Division
Agent (each) .............................................................. $102,692
Chief ............................................................................ 151,068
Chief Deputy (each) .................................................... 137,336
Senior Agent (each) ..................................................... 108,096
Special Agent (each) ................................................... 113,501
Supervisor (each) ......................................................... 124,848
(c) Enforcement Division
Agent (each) .............................................................. $102,692
Chief ............................................................................ 151,068
Chief Deputy (each) .................................................... 137,336
Senior Agent (each) ..................................................... 108,096
Special Agent (each) ................................................... 113,501
Supervisor (each) ......................................................... 124,848
(d) Gaming Control Board
Chair .......................................................................... $211,643
Executive Secretary ..................................................... 137,336
Member (each) ............................................................ 196,790
(e) Investigations Division
Agent (each) .............................................................. $102,692
Chief ............................................................................ 151,068
Chief Deputy (each) .................................................... 137,336
Investigative Services Manager (each) ........................ 133,592
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Senior Agent (each) ................................................... $108,096
Special Agent (each) ................................................... 113,501
Supervisor (each) ......................................................... 124,848
(f) Tax and License Division
Agent (each) .............................................................. $102,692
Chief ............................................................................ 151,068
Chief Deputy ............................................................... 137,336
Senior Agent (each) ..................................................... 108,096
Special Agent (each) ................................................... 113,501
Supervisor (each) ......................................................... 124,848
(g) Technology Division
Chief .......................................................................... $161,366
Chief Deputy, Technology .......................................... 147,528
Engineer, Technology (each) ....................................... 133,813
Information Security Officer ....................................... 133,813
Senior Agent (each) ..................................................... 108,096
Senior Engineer, Technology (each) ........................... 140,502
Technician, Technology (each) ..................................... 87,570
(h) Miscellaneous
Executive Assistant ..................................................... $83,426
Financial Officer .......................................................... 118,861
Hearings Officer (each) ............................................... 132,294
Human Resources Manager ......................................... 133,592
Information Management Coordinator ........................ 118,861
Information Technology Manager ............................... 147,185
Network Specialist I (each) ......................................... 105,224
Network Specialist II (each) ........................................ 116,205
Programming Manager ................................................ 138,486
Programming Supervisor ............................................. 130,496
Senior Application Developer (each) .......................... 117,157
Senior Economic Analyst ............................................ 132,245
Senior Network Specialist ........................................... 126,163
Senior Policy Counsel ................................................. 132,245
Senior Research Specialist .......................................... 132,245
Supervisor (each) ......................................................... 124,848
Systems Administrator (each) ..................................... 124,415
System Manager .......................................................... 138,486
38. Office of the Military:
Adjutant General ....................................................... $180,534
Administrative Assistant, StarBase
Program (each) ......................................................... 73,304
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Administrator, Nevada National Guard
Youth Challenge Program .................................... $123,370
Administrator, StarBase Program (each) ..................... 115,319
Administrator, Youth Programs .................................. 151,902
Deputy Administrator, StarBase
Program .................................................................. 105,672
Nevada National Guard Enlisted – State
Active Duty (each) ................................................. 123,002
Nevada National Guard Officer – State
Active Duty (each) ................................................. 202,451
Nevada National Guard Warrant
Officer – State Active Duty (each) ......................... 138,386
Nevada National Guard, Cyber Security
Specialist ................................................................ 132,704
Psychological Health Clinical Manager ...................... 115,319
Psychological Health Therapist (each) ........................ 104,713
Training Specialist (each) .............................................. 99,698
39. Peace Officers’ Standards and Training Commission:
Bureau Chief (each) ................................................... $109,225
Deputy Director ........................................................... 124,068
Director ........................................................................ 138,385
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Training Specialist (each) .............................................. 99,698
40. Public Utilities Commission of Nevada:
Administrative Attorney (each) ................................. $135,201
Assistant Commission Secretary ................................. 135,201
Chair ............................................................................ 196,790
Chief Attorney (each) .................................................. 167,014
Commission Policy Advisory (each) ........................... 146,798
Commission Secretary ................................................. 151,902
Consumer Outreach ..................................................... 115,318
Director, Regulatory Operations ................................. 177,168
Executive Assistant (each) ............................................ 79,532
Executive Director ....................................................... 186,335
General Counsel .......................................................... 187,431
Manager, Engineering ................................................. 168,732
Manager, Information Technology .............................. 138,385
Manager, Policy Analysis ............................................ 168,835
Manager, Regulatory Accounting ............................... 151,902
Manager, Resource and Market Analysis .................... 151,902
Manager, Systems Operation....................................... 129,975
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
Public Education and Statistical
Analysis Officer (each) .......................................... $95,437
Public Utilities Commissioner (each) .......................... 186,480
Regulatory Accountant (each) ..................................... 126,547
Regulatory Economist (each) ...................................... 132,245
Regulatory Engineer (each) ......................................... 146,017
Senior Attorney (each) ................................................ 151,108
Senior Utility Analyst (each) ....................................... 103,461
Senior Compliance Investigator .................................. 103,461
Staff Counsel ............................................................... 187,431
41. State Public Charter School Authority:
Deputy Director ......................................................... $124,068
Director ........................................................................ 138,385
Staff Attorney .............................................................. 135,201
42. Cannabis Compliance Board:
Administrative Law Judge ......................................... $151,108
Chief of Administration ............................................... 133,592
Chief of Inspections/Audit .......................................... 133,592
Chief of Investigations ................................................ 133,592
Deputy Director ........................................................... 151,902
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Executive Director ....................................................... 165,420
43. Nevada Health Authority:
Actuary ...................................................................... $138,385
Administrative Assistant, Patient
Protection Commission ............................................ 67,290
Agency Manager (each) .............................................. 151,108
Chief Biostatistician, Data Analytics .......................... 138,385
Deputy Director (each) ................................................ 151,902
Deputy Division Administrator (each) ........................ 151,902
Director ........................................................................ 180,534
Division Administrator (each) ..................................... 165,420
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Executive Director, Patient Protection
Commission............................................................ 124,068
General Counsel .......................................................... 198,825
Medical Epidemiologist............................................... 219,975
Policy Analyst, Patient Protection
Commission............................................................ 104,729
State Dental Health Officer ......................................... 219,975
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
Annual
Title or Position Salary
(a) Public Employees’ Benefits Program
Chief Financial Officer .............................................. $135,201
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Executive Officer ........................................................ 174,967
Lead Insurance Counsel .............................................. 151,108
Operations Officer ....................................................... 148,721
Quality Control Officer ............................................... 135,201
(b) Silver State Health Insurance Exchange
Administrative Assistant (each) .................................. $67,290
Benefit Manager (each) ................................................. 85,816
Communications Officer ............................................. 104,705
Executive Assistant ....................................................... 79,532
Executive Director ....................................................... 165,420
Finance and Research Officer ..................................... 114,693
Grants and Projects Analyst .......................................... 79,005
Information Systems Manager .................................... 137,922
Information Technology Analyst .................................. 98,164
Operations Manager .................................................... 148,721
Quality Assurance Officer ........................................... 117,633
Training Specialist ......................................................... 89,115
44. Medical and Related Positions:
Pharmacist 1 (each) ................................................... $140,731
Pharmacist 2 (each) ..................................................... 154,803
Pharmacist 3 (each) ..................................................... 170,285
Senior Institutional Dentist (Range B)
(each) ...................................................................... 195,707
Senior Physician (Range C) (each) .............................. 219,975
Senior Psychiatrist (Range C) (each) .......................... 250,049
 A Senior Psychiatrist (Range C) is a psychiatrist certified by the
American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.
Sec. 2. 1. If any unclassified position or other position
intended to be included in section 1 of this act is inadvertently
omitted from this act for Fiscal Year 2025-2026 or Fiscal Year
2026-2027, the Division of Human Resource Management of the
Department of Administration shall examine the duties and
responsibilities of the position and submit to the Interim Finance
Committee a list of those duties and responsibilities and a
recommended salary for the position. The Interim Finance
Committee shall review the duties and responsibilities of the
position and establish the salary for the position.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
2. If the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau determines that the title or maximum salary for a position set
forth in section 1 of this act contains a typographical or other error
that misrepresents the maximum salary intended to be set forth in
section 1 of this act, the Interim Finance Committee may review the
duties and responsibilities of the position and establish the
appropriate title and maximum salary for the position pursuant to
the intent of the 83rd Session of the Nevada Legislature.
3. An employee occupying a position that is currently in the
classified service which is moved into the unclassified service or
other position in section 1 of this act has the option to remain in the
classified service at his or her current grade, with all rights afforded
classified employees, or move into the unclassified service. If the
employee chooses to move into the unclassified service, the
employee cannot at a later date choose to return to the classified
service while occupying the position.
4. Once an employee vacates the position moved into the
unclassified service pursuant to this act, the employee who is the
replacement in the position will be in the unclassified service.
5. If the salary for a position that is currently in the classified
service or nonclassified service and that is moved into the
unclassified service is reduced pursuant to this act, the salary for the
employee currently serving in the position will be retained at its
current level. Once the employee serving in the position vacates the
position, the unclassified salary is established at the level set forth in
section 1 of this act.
6. If the salary for an employee occupying a position in the
unclassified service on June 30, 2025, is more than the maximum
salary for that position set forth in section 1 of this act, the salary for
that employee must be retained at the level in effect on June 30,
2025. Once an employee vacates a position for which the previous
salary is retained pursuant to this subsection, the maximum salary
for that position must be reduced to the amount set forth in section 1
of this act.
Sec. 3. The Department of Human Services and the
Department of Corrections may adopt a plan to authorize additional
payments of up to $60 for a specified period on a weeknight and up
to $100 for a specified period on a weekend day for unclassified
employees who are Senior Psychiatrists, Psychiatrists, Senior
Physicians or Pharmacists to perform on-call responsibilities to
ensure 24-hour coverage in psychiatric treatment facilities and
correctional facilities and institutions. On-call responsibilities for
Senior Psychiatrists, Psychiatrists and Senior Physicians include,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
without limitation, attending to clinical emergencies, evaluation of
patients subject to seclusion and restraint and completing rounds
during weekends. On-call responsibilities for Pharmacists include,
without limitation, consultation with medical personnel and first
dosage reviews.
Sec. 4. The Nevada Gaming Control Board may adopt a plan
to authorize additional payments of up to $5,000 annually for
unclassified employees who possess a current Nevada certified
public accountant certificate, a license to practice law in the State of
Nevada or any other state, or who are in a qualifying position as an
electronic laboratory engineer and possess a bachelor of science or
higher degree in engineering, electronic engineering or computer
science and utilize, in the opinion of the Board, the skills evidenced
by such qualifications to further enhance the performance of their
job duties and responsibilities.
Sec. 5. If the name of an officer or agency has been changed
or the responsibilities of an officer or agency have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of another act enacted by the 83rd Session
of the Nevada Legislature and approved by the Governor and the
change in name or transfer of duties is not indicated in this act, any
reference to that officer or agency in this act shall be deemed to
refer to the officer or agency the name of which or duties of which
have been changed or transferred by the other act.
Sec. 6. NRS 218A.605 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218A.605 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
employees of the Senate and the Assembly must be paid, for all
services rendered by them under the provisions of this chapter, the
following base amounts of money for each day’s employment:
[Assistant Secretary/Assistant Chief Clerk....................... $111
Document Clerk ................................................................. 105
History Clerk ...................................................................... 105
Journal Clerk ...................................................................... 105
Media Clerk ........................................................................ 105
Recording Clerk ................................................................. 105
Sergeant at Arms ................................................................ 105
Deputy/Senior Sergeant at Arms .......................................... 90
Assistant Sergeant at Arms ................................................... 84
Senior Page ........................................................................... 77
Page/Student ......................................................................... 61
Clerical Services Administrator/Supervisor of
Clerical Services ............................................................ 111
Executive Assistant ............................................................ 103
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
Executive Secretary ............................................................ $98
Leadership Receptionist ....................................................... 90
Senior Secretary ................................................................... 90
Secretary ............................................................................... 84
Senior Committee Manager ................................................ 103
Committee Manager ............................................................. 98
Lead Committee Secretary ................................................. 103
Secretary for Senate Committee on Finance or
Assembly Committee on Ways and Means ................... 101
Senior Committee Secretary ................................................. 98
Committee Secretary ............................................................ 90
Senior Proofreader ................................................................ 98
Proofreader ........................................................................... 90
Committee Minutes Coordinator .......................................... 98
Data Entry Technician .......................................................... 82
Word Processing Clerk ......................................................... 69
Reproduction Services Supervisor ....................................... 90
Bill Services Administrator/Supervisor of Bill
Services ........................................................................... 82
Assistant Bill Services Administrator/Supervisor
of Bill Services ................................................................ 75
Bill Services Clerk ............................................................... 61]
House Clerk 12 ........................................................... $261.02
House Clerk 11 ............................................................. 246.93
House Clerk 10 ............................................................. 242.22
House Clerk 09 ............................................................. 237.51
House Clerk 08 ............................................................. 230.46
House Clerk 07 ............................................................. 211.67
House Clerk 06 ............................................................. 197.53
House Clerk 05 ............................................................. 192.84
House Clerk 04 ............................................................. 181.07
House Clerk 03 ............................................................. 176.37
House Clerk 02 ............................................................. 162.17
House Clerk 01 ............................................................. 143.37
2. In addition to the positions listed in subsection 1, the
Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the Assembly may
establish additional positions as necessary and shall establish an
appropriate base amount for those additional positions.
3. The base amount paid to an employee of the Legislature
listed in subsection 1 or created pursuant to subsection 2:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
(a) Must be increased cumulatively by each cost of living
increase granted to employees in the classified service of the State
that becomes effective on or after July 1, [2001;] 2025; and
(b) May be increased cumulatively by the Secretary of the
Senate or the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, as applicable, by:
(1) One step of 5 percent for each regular session during
which the employee previously worked for the Legislature in the
same or a similar position, not to exceed the number of steps in
the State’s compensation schedule per position, if the Secretary of
the Senate or the Chief Clerk of the Assembly determined that the
employee performed his or her duties in a satisfactory manner
during the previous regular session or sessions; or
(2) One or more steps of 5 percent, not to exceed the number
of steps in the State’s compensation schedule per position, as
determined by the Secretary of the Senate or the Chief Clerk of the
Assembly, based upon previous service with the Legislative Counsel
Bureau in a position that is similar to the position with the Senate or
the Assembly, as applicable.
4. If an employee of the Legislative Counsel Bureau transfers
to a position with the Senate or the Assembly during a regular or
special session, the employee may, with the approval of the
Secretary of the Senate or the Chief Clerk of the Assembly, continue
to be paid on an hourly basis at the same rate that the employee was
being paid by the Legislative Counsel Bureau if the position with
the Legislative Counsel Bureau is similar to the position with the
Senate or the Assembly, as applicable.
5. During periods of adjournment to a day certain, employees
of the Legislature whose service is required shall perform duties as
assigned and are entitled to be paid the amount specified in
subsection 1 for each day of service, as adjusted pursuant to
subsection 3, if applicable.
6. During periods before the commencement of a regular or
special session and after the adjournment of a regular or special
session sine die, employees of the Legislature whose service is
required shall perform duties as assigned and are entitled to be paid
at an hourly rate commensurate with the daily rate specified in
subsection 1, as applicable, and are entitled to be compensated for
overtime in the same manner as provided for employees of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau.
Sec. 7. NRS 223.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
223.425 1. The Director of the Office of Finance shall
appoint [a] one or more Deputy [Director] Directors of the Office.
2. [The] Each Deputy Director:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
(a) Serves at the pleasure of the Director;
(b) Is in the unclassified service of the State; and
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 284.143, shall devote
his or her entire time and attention to the business of the Office of
Finance and shall not pursue any other business or occupation or
hold any other office of profit.
Sec. 8. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in NRS
218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after May 18,
2025.
Sec. 9. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)